Illinois, session 104th, HB4357.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Sections 16-120 and 16-125 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/16-120)7    Sec. 16-120. Decision on complaints. In counties with 83,000,000 or more inhabitants, at its meeting for the purpose 9of revising and correcting the assessments, the board of 10appeals (until the first Monday in December 1998 and the board 11of review beginning the first Monday in December 1998 and 12thereafter), upon complaint filed by a taxpayer or taxing 13district as prescribed in this Code, may revise the entire 14assessment of any taxpayer, or any part thereof, and correct 15the same as shall appear to the board to be just. The 16assessment of the property of any taxpayer shall not be 17increased unless that taxpayer or that taxpayer's his agent 18shall first have been notified in writing and been given an 19opportunity to be heard. In making a decision upon a complaint 20filed by a complainant's agent, the board shall be limited to 21the evidence presented by the complainant or the complainant's 22agent, the county assessor, and a taxing district, and each 23complaint shall be limited to the grounds listed in the   HB4357- 2 -LRB104 16905 HLH 30316 b1petition, the supporting documents filed with the board, and 2the rebuttal evidence filed with the board. No assessment may 3be revised and corrected until the complainant or the 4complainant's agent has been given a period of 30 days to 5review and rebut a decision of the board. 6(Source: P.A. 88-455; 89-126, eff. 7-11-95; 89-671, eff. 78-14-96.) 8    (35 ILCS 200/16-125)9    Sec. 16-125. Hearings. In counties with 3,000,000 or more 10inhabitants, complaints filed with the board of appeals (until 11the first Monday in December 1998 and the board of review 12beginning the first Monday in December 1998 and thereafter) 13shall be classified by townships. All complaints shall be 14docketed numerically, in the order in which they are 15presented, as nearly as possible, in books or computer records 16kept for that purpose, which shall be open to public 17inspection. The complaints shall be considered by townships 18until they have been heard and passed upon by the board. After 19completing final action on all matters in a township, the 20board shall transmit such final actions to the county 21assessor.22    A hearing upon any complaint shall not be held until the 23taxpayer affected and the county assessor have each been 24notified and have been given an opportunity to be heard. An 25oral hearing shall be granted on request of any complainant or   HB4357- 3 -LRB104 16905 HLH 30316 b1any complainant's agent. All hearings shall be open to the 2public and the board shall sit together and hear the 3representations of the interested parties or their 4representatives. An order for a correction of any assessment 5shall not be made unless both commissioners of the board, or a 6majority of the members in the case of a board of review, 7concur therein, in which case, an order for correction shall 8be made in open session and entered in the records of the 9board. Beginning with the 2027 assessment year, when a 10decision is made on a complaint, When an assessment is ordered 11corrected, the board shall transmit a computer printout of the 12results, or make and sign a brief written statement of the 13decision reason for the change and the manner in which the 14method used by the assessor in making the assessment was 15erroneous, and shall deliver a copy of the statement to the 16county assessor, the complainant, and the complainant's agent, 17if any. Upon request the board shall hear any taxpayer in 18opposition to a proposed reduction in any assessment.19    The board may destroy or otherwise dispose of complaints 20and records pertaining thereto after the lapse of 5 years from 21the date of filing.22(Source: P.A. 97-1054, eff. 1-1-13.)